Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 3. Adult Education.

§ 22.1-223.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Adult basic education”
means education for individuals over the age of compulsory school attendance specified in § 22.1-254 that enables them to express themselves orally and in writing, read, access information and resources, make decisions, act independently and interact with others, and continue lifelong learning to cope with and compete successfully in a global economy.

“Adult education program”
means an instructional program below the college credit level provided by public schools for individuals who are not enrolled in the regular public school program, including adult basic education, credit programs, cultural adult education, external diploma programs, general adult education, and high school equivalency programs.

“Credit program”
means a program of academic courses that are available to individuals over the age of compulsory school attendance specified in § 22.1-254 to enable them to complete the regular requirements for a high school diploma.

“Cultural adult education”
means English for speakers of other languages (ESOL), the preparation of foreign-born adults for participation in American life or for becoming American citizens, and other educational services for foreign-born individuals over the age of compulsory school attendance specified in § 22.1-254.

“External diploma program”
means a program in which individuals over the age of compulsory school attendance specified in § 22.1-254 who did not complete high school may earn a high school diploma by demonstrating with 100 percent mastery the 65 competencies established and validated by the American Council on Education.

“General adult education”
means academic, cultural, and avocational instruction for individuals over the age of compulsory school attendance specified in § 22.1-254 that may be obtained through programs other than credit programs, high school equivalency programs, or external diploma programs.

“High school equivalency program”
means a program of preparation and instruction to take a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education for individuals over the age of compulsory school attendance specified in § 22.1-254 who did not complete high school, individuals who have been granted permission by the superintendent of the school division in which they are or were last enrolled to take a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education, individuals who are at least 16 years of age, and individuals who have been ordered by a court to participate in the program.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-360; 1978, c. 522; 1980, c. 559; 1999, c. 564; 2006, c. 335; 2014, c. 84; 2018, c. 717.

The 1999 amendment

deleted the subdivision designators 1 through 4, in former subdivision 1, substituted “program” means an instructional program” for “programs” means instructional programs,” and substituted “adult basic education, credit programs, cultural adult education, external diploma programs” for “basic adult education,” deleted former subdivision 2 which read: “Basic adult education” means education for adults whose inability to speak, read, or write the English language constitutes a substantial impairment of their real ability, which is designed to help eliminate such inability and raise the level of education of such adults so as to make them less likely to become dependent on others, improve their ability to benefit from occupational training and otherwise increase their opportunities for more productive and profitable employment, and make them better able to meet their adult responsibilities,” added the paragraphs defining “Credit program,” “Cultural adult education,” and “External diploma program,” and in former subdivision 3 rewrote the paragraph which formerly read: “General adult education” means academic, cultural, or avocational instruction,” and in former subdivision 4 substituted “of preparation and instruction for adults” for “whereby an adult,” and substituted “and for youth who have been granted permission by the division superintendent of the school in which they are enrolled to take the test for the general educational development certificate” for “by achieving satisfactory scores on tests of the program, may earn a high school equivalency certificate.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 335, in the definition of “General education development program,” substituted “high school, for students” for “high school and for youth,” deleted “division” preceding “superintendent,” substituted “school division in which they are or were last enrolled” for “school in which they are enrolled” and added “and for those who have been ordered by a court to participate in the program.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 84, in the definition of “Adult education program,” deleted “general educational development” following “general adult education, and” and inserted “preparing students to pass a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” at the end; in the definition of “General adult education,” substituted “programs preparing students to pass a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “a general educational development (GED) program,” inserted “approved by the Board of Education” at the end; substituted the definition of “High school equivalency program” for “General education development program” and substituted “a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “the test for the general educational development certificate.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 717 substituted “individuals over the age of compulsory school attendance specified in § 22.1-254” for “adults” throughout; in the definition of “Adult education program,” substituted “individuals” for “persons over the age of compulsory school attendance specified in § 22.1-254” and “high school equivalency programs” for “programs preparing students to pass a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education”; and rewrote the definitions of “General adult education” and “High school equivalency program.”

§ 22.1-224.
Duties of State Board.

The Board of Education shall:

Require the development of adult education programs in every school division;

Encourage coordination in the development and provision of adult education programs between school boards and other state, federal, and local public and private agencies;

Promulgate appropriate standards and guidelines for adult education programs;

Accept and administer grants, gifts, services, and funds from available sources for use in adult education programs; and

Assist school divisions with all diligence in meeting the educational needs of individuals participating in adult education programs to master the requirements for and earn a high school diploma or to pass a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-361; 1978, c. 522; 1980, c. 559; 1999, c. 564; 2014, c. 84; 2018, c. 717.

The 1999 amendment

substituted “Require” for “Stimulate and encourage” in subdivision 1, in subdivision 2, deleted “Stimulate and” at the beginning, and inserted “and” preceding “local public,” added “and” at the end of subdivision 4, and added subdivision 5.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 84, in subsection 5, substituted “a” for “a general educational development (GED) certificate or” and inserted “or to pass a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” at the end of the sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 717 substituted “individuals” for “adults” in subdivision 5.

§ 22.1-225.
Authority of school boards.

Local school boards shall provide adult education programs, in compliance with subdivision D 8 of § 22.1-253.13:1, for residents of the school division and, in their discretion, may charge appropriate fees to persons admitted to such programs.

With such funds as may be appropriated for the purposes of this article, school boards shall seek to ensure that every individual participating in such program has an opportunity to earn a high school diploma or pass a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-362; 1978, c. 522; 1980, c. 559; 1999, c. 564; 2004, cc. 939, 955; 2009, c. 802; 2014, c. 84; 2018, c. 717.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s notes under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

The 1999 amendment

rewrote this section, which read: “Every school board is authorized to provide adult education programs and may, in its discretion, charge persons admitted to such programs fees therefor.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and substituted “§ 22.1-253.13:1 D 7” for “§ 22.1-253.13:1 D 9” in subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 802 substituted “subdivision D 8 of § 22.1-253.13:1” for “§ 22.1-253.13:1 D 7” in subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 84, in subsection B, substituted “or pass a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “a general educational development (GED) certificate or.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 717 substituted “individual” for “adult” in subsection B.

§ 22.1-226.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 61, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-226, relating to allocation of state funds, evaluation and reporting requirements for adult education programs, was derived from Code 1950, § 22-363; 1978, c. 522; 1980, c. 559; 1999, c. 564.